California, session 20252026, SB506.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 132655 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:132655. The governing board of the authority shall be composed of one representative from each of the following entities to be appointed by the governing board, mayor, or supervisor of each entity:(a) The Bay Area Rapid Transit District.(b) The City of Dublin.(c) The City of Lathrop.(d) The City of Livermore.(e) The City of Manteca.(f) The City of Pleasanton.(g) The City of Stockton.(h) The City of Tracy.(i) The County of Alameda.(j) The County of San Joaquin.(k) The Livermore Amador Valley Transit Authority.(l) The City of Mountain House.(m) The San Joaquin Regional Rail Commission.(n) The City of Danville.(o) The City of San Ramon.SEC. 2. Section 1967.3 of the Streets and Highways Code is amended to read:1967.3. The authority is formulating a transportation program in connection with the authority’s redevelopment activities on Treasure Island. The board of supervisors directed that the transportation program ensure adequate and reliable funding for transit service for Treasure Island, including bus transit service provided by the city’s municipal transportation agency, or its successor agency. In formulating the transportation program, the authority shall make recommendations for the governance structure of the transportation management agency. Based on the authority’s recommendations, the board of supervisors may designate a board or agency that shall act as the transportation management agency. The board of supervisors may revise or revoke this designation of the transportation management agency and designate a new board or agency to act as the transportation management agency at any time. The board of supervisors may also designate itself as the transportation management agency. Notwithstanding Chapter 898 of the Statutes of 1997, any subsequent amendments to that chapter, but subject to Section 1967.5, the transportation management agency shall have the exclusive power to do any or all of the following pursuant to the terms of a resolution or ordinance adopted by the board of supervisors:(a) Adopt and administer the transportation program and implementing rules and regulations.(b) Recommend to the board of supervisors an initial fee structure for the imposition of congestion pricing fees applicable to residents and other motorists as they enter or exit Treasure Island in the amount deemed necessary and proper by the transportation management agency to implement the transportation program.(c) Adopt amendments to the congestion pricing fee structure initially adopted by the board of supervisors pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1967.5, as the transportation management agency deems necessary and appropriate from time to time to implement the transportation program, based upon a finding that the amendments to the fee have a relationship or benefit to the motor vehicle drivers who are paying the fee.(d) Administer and collect congestion pricing fees on Treasure Island.(e) Adopt on-street and off-street parking regulations for Treasure Island, including regulations limiting parking, stopping, standing, or loading and establishing parking privileges and locations, parking meter zones, and other forms of parking regulation similar to those adopted for other areas of San Francisco.(f) Adopt on-street and off-street parking fees, fines, and penalties for Treasure Island and administer and collect all on-street and off-street parking fees, fines, penalties, and other parking-related revenues on Treasure Island.(g) Adopt a transit pass fee structure applicable to residents and other users of Treasure Island and administer and collect all Treasure Island transit pass fees.(h) Fix the rates and charges for services provided or functions performed by the transportation management agency and administer and collect those rates and charges.(i) Apply for, accept, and administer state, federal, local agency, or other public or private grant funds for transportation purposes.(j) Administer and collect all other revenues generated by the transportation program.(k) Undertake studies, performance evaluations, and other mechanisms as it deems necessary and proper to adopt and amend the transportation program with the purpose of relieving transportation-related impacts.(l) Expend its revenues for any purpose related to the transportation program, including costs of implementation, operation, collection and enforcement, maintenance, construction, and administration under the transportation program.(m) Enter into contracts, cooperative agreements, and direct funding agreements with private parties and governmental agencies, including city departments, to the extent deemed necessary and proper by the transportation management agency to implement the transportation program, including for any of the following:(1) The construction and maintenance of transportation facilities serving Treasure Island that are directly related to the transportation program, including design, preconstruction, and other related costs.(2) Transit capital improvements and operations for services that directly serve Treasure Island.(3) Notwithstanding Section 40717.9 of the Health and Safety Code, implementation of transportation impact mitigation measures as adopted from time to time to improve or encourage the use of transit and other nonmotor vehicle means of access to Treasure Island.(n) Adopt rules and regulations governing high-occupancy vehicles pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1967.5.(o) Take all other steps as the transportation management agency deems necessary and proper to implement the transportation program.SEC. 3. Section 1967.5 of the Streets and Highways Code is amended to read:1967.5. (a) The board of supervisors, by a two-thirds majority vote, shall have the authority to adopt a program imposing congestion pricing fees for motor vehicles exiting and entering Treasure Island from the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge and an initial congestion pricing fee structure after consideration of the recommendation of the transportation management agency. The congestion pricing fees shall not be imposed on local trips on Treasure Island streets that do not exit to the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge. Once adopted, the congestion pricing program may only be terminated by the recommendation of both the authority and the transportation management agency, followed by a two-thirds majority vote of the board of supervisors.(b) (1) Prior to imposing the initial congestion pricing fees, the board of supervisors shall make a finding of fact by a two-thirds majority vote that the congestion pricing fees have a relationship or benefit to the motor vehicle drivers who are paying the fee.(2) In order to ensure that congestion pricing fees are not instituted prior to new residents establishing residence on Treasure Island, initial congestion pricing fees shall not be imposed prior to the effective date of the disposition and development agreement for the redevelopment of Treasure Island.(3) All fees, rates, and charges adopted in furtherance of the transportation program, including congestion pricing fees, on-street and off-street parking fees, fines and penalties, transit pass fees, and any other rates and charges that are adopted by the transportation management agency from time to time, be collected and used by the transportation management agency to implement the transportation program.(c) While congestion pricing fees remain in effect, the transferor of any sale or lease agreement of real property on Treasure Island shall be required to include a written disclosure to the potential purchaser or lessee that use of a motor vehicle to and from Treasure Island may be subject to congestion pricing fees.(d) At all periods of the day, whether or not the congestion pricing fees are in effect, high-occupancy vehicles shall be able to exit or enter Treasure Island free of charge.SEC. 4. Section 12815 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:12815. (a) If a driver’s license issued under this code is lost, destroyed or mutilated, or a new true, full name is acquired, the person to whom it was issued shall obtain a duplicate upon furnishing to the department (1) satisfactory proof of that loss, destruction, or mutilation and (2) if the licensee is a minor, evidence of permission to obtain a duplicate secured from the parents, guardian, or person having custody of the minor. Any person who loses a driver’s license and who, after obtaining a duplicate, finds the original license shall immediately destroy the original license.(b) A person in possession of a valid driver’s license who has been informed either by the department or by a law enforcement agency that the document is mutilated shall surrender the license to the department not later than 10 days after that notification.(c) A person who submits a change of address pursuant to Section 14600 may apply to the department for a duplicate driver’s license. If a person receives a duplicate pursuant to this subdivision, they shall immediately destroy the license with the prior mailing address.(d) For purposes of this section, a mutilated license is one that has been damaged sufficiently to render any or all of the elements of identity set forth in Sections 12800.5 and 12811 unreadable or unidentifiable through visual, mechanical, or electronic means.SEC. 5. Section 26708 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:26708. (a) (1) A person shall not drive any motor vehicle with any object or material placed, displayed, installed, affixed, or applied upon the windshield or side or rear windows.(2) A person shall not drive any motor vehicle with any object or material placed, displayed, installed, affixed, or applied in or upon the vehicle that obstructs or reduces the driver’s clear view through the windshield or side windows.(3) This subdivision applies to a person driving a motor vehicle with the driver’s clear vision through the windshield, or side or rear windows, obstructed by snow or ice.(b) This section does not apply to any of the following:(1) Rearview mirrors.(2) Adjustable nontransparent sunvisors that are mounted forward of the side windows and are not attached to the glass.(3) Signs, stickers, or other materials that are displayed in a seven-inch square in the lower corner of the windshield farthest removed from the driver, signs, stickers, or other materials that are displayed in a seven-inch square in the lower corner of the rear window farthest removed from the driver, or signs, stickers, or other materials that are displayed in a five-inch square in the lower corner of the windshield nearest the driver.(4) Side windows that are to the rear of the driver.(5) Direction, destination, or terminus signs upon a passenger common carrier motor vehicle or a schoolbus, if those signs do not interfere with the driver’s clear view of approaching traffic.(6) Rear window wiper motor.(7) Rear trunk lid handle or hinges.(8) The rear window or windows, if the motor vehicle is equipped with outside mirrors on both the left- and right-hand sides of the vehicle that are so located as to reflect to the driver a view of the highway through each mirror for a distance of at least 200 feet to the rear of the vehicle.(9) A clear, transparent lens affixed to the side window opposite the driver on a vehicle greater than 80 inches in width and that occupies an area not exceeding 50 square inches of the lowest corner toward the rear of that window and that provides the driver with a wide-angle view through the lens.(10) Sun screening devices meeting the requirements of Section 26708.2 installed on the side windows on either side of the vehicle’s front seat, if the driver or a passenger in the front seat has in their possession a letter or other document signed by a licensed physician and surgeon certifying that the person must be shaded from the sun due to a medical condition, or has in their possession a letter or other document signed by a licensed optometrist certifying that the person must be shaded from the sun due to a visual condition. The devices authorized by this paragraph shall not be used during darkness.(11) An electronic communication device affixed to the center uppermost portion of the interior of a windshield within an area that is not greater than five inches square, if the device provides either of the following:(A) The capability for enforcement facilities of the Department of the California Highway Patrol to communicate with a vehicle equipped with the device.(B) The capability for electronic toll and traffic management on public or private roads or facilities.(12) A portable Global Positioning System (GPS), which may be mounted in a seven-inch square in the lower corner of the windshield farthest removed from the driver or in a five-inch square in the lower corner of the windshield nearest to the driver and outside of an airbag deployment zone, if the system is used only for door-to-door navigation while the motor vehicle is being operated.(13) (A) A video event recorder with the capability of monitoring driver performance to improve driver safety, which may be mounted in a seven-inch square in the lower corner of the windshield farthest removed from the driver, in a five-inch square in the lower corner of the windshield nearest to the driver and outside of an airbag deployment zone, or in a five-inch square mounted to the center uppermost portion of the interior of the windshield. As used in this section, “video event recorder” means a video recorder that continuously records in a digital loop, recording audio, video, and G-force levels, but saves video only when triggered by an unusual motion or crash or when operated by the driver to monitor driver performance.(B) A vehicle equipped with a video event recorder shall have a notice posted in a visible location which states that a passenger’s conversation may be recorded.(C) Video event recorders shall store no more than 30 seconds before and after a triggering event.(D) The registered owner or lessee of the vehicle may disable the device.(E) The data recorded to the device is the property of the registered owner or lessee of the vehicle.(F) When a person is driving for hire as an employee in a vehicle with a video event recorder, the person’s employer shall provide unedited copies of the recordings upon the request of the employee or the employee’s representative. These copies shall be provided free of charge to the employee and within five days of the request.(14) Vehicle safety technology, as defined in Section 393.5 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, installed on any vehicle listed in Section 34500 and subject to Section 34500.7 that is otherwise in compliance with Section 393.60 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), transparent material may be installed, affixed, or applied to the topmost portion of the windshield if the following conditions apply:(1) The bottom edge of the material is at least 29 inches above the undepressed driver’s seat when measured from a point five inches in front of the bottom of the backrest with the driver’s seat in its rearmost and lowermost position with the vehicle on a level surface.(2) The material is not red or amber in color.(3) There is no opaque lettering on the material and any other lettering does not affect primary colors or distort vision through the windshield.(4) The material does not reflect sunlight or headlight glare into the eyes of occupants of oncoming or following vehicles to any greater extent than the windshield without the material.(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), clear, colorless, and transparent material may be installed, affixed, or applied to the front side windows, located to the immediate left and right of the front seat if the following conditions are met:(1) The material has a minimum visible light transmittance of 88 percent.(2) The window glazing with the material applied meets all requirements of Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard No. 205 (49 C.F.R. 571.205), including the specified minimum light transmittance of 70 percent and the abrasion resistance of AS–14 glazing, as specified in that federal standard.(3) The material is designed and manufactured to enhance the ability of the existing window glass to block the sun’s harmful ultraviolet A rays.(4) The driver has in their possession, or within the vehicle, a certificate signed by the installing company certifying that the windows with the material installed meet the requirements of this subdivision and the certificate identifies the installing company and the material’s manufacturer by full name and street address, or, if the material was installed by the vehicle owner, a certificate signed by the material’s manufacturer certifying that the windows with the material installed according to manufacturer’s instructions meet the requirements of this subdivision and the certificate identifies the material’s manufacturer by full name and street address.(5) If the material described in this subdivision tears or bubbles, or is otherwise worn to prohibit clear vision, it shall be removed or replaced.(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), clear, colorless, and transparent material may be installed, affixed, or applied to the windshield, side, or rear windows of a motor vehicle if the following conditions are met:(1) The material has a minimum visible light transmittance of 88 percent.(2) The window glazing with the material applied meets all requirements of Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard No. 205 (49 C.F.R. 571.205), including the specified minimum light transmittance of 70 percent and the abrasion resistance of AS–14 glazing, as specified in that federal standard.(3) The material is designed and manufactured to enhance the ability of the existing window glass to block the sun’s harmful ultraviolet A rays.(4) The driver has in their possession, or within the vehicle, a certificate signed by a licensed dermatologist certifying that the person should not be exposed to ultraviolet rays because of a medical condition that necessitates clear, colorless, and transparent film material to be installed on the windshield, side, or rear windows.(5) If the material described in this subdivision tears or bubbles, or is otherwise worn to prohibit clear vision, it shall be removed or replaced.SEC. 6. Section 34501.2 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:34501.2. (a) The regulations adopted under Section 34501 for vehicles engaged in interstate or intrastate commerce shall establish hours-of-service regulations for drivers of those vehicles that are consistent with the hours-of-service regulations adopted by the United States Department of Transportation in Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as those regulations now exist or are hereafter amended.(b) The regulations adopted under Section 34501 for vehicles engaged in intrastate commerce that are not transporting hazardous substances or hazardous waste, as those terms are defined by regulations in Section 171.8 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as those regulations now exist or are hereafter amended, shall have the following exceptions:(1) (A) The maximum driving time within a work period shall be 12 hours for a driver of a truck or truck tractor, except for a driver of a tank vehicle with a capacity of more than 500 gallons transporting flammable liquid, who shall not drive for more than 10 hours within a work period.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the regulations may authorize a driver to exceed the maximum driving time prescribed in subparagraph (A) and on-duty time prescribed in paragraph (2) during a state of emergency declared by the Governor when operating within the state to transport fuel, pursuant to a contract with this state or the United States, used for the purpose of refueling aircraft used in emergency-related activities, including fire suppression.(2) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), a motor carrier shall not permit or require a driver to drive, nor shall a driver drive, for any period after having been on duty for 80 hours in any consecutive eight days.(3) (A) A driver employed by an electrical corporation, as defined in Section 218 of the Public Utilities Code, a local publicly owned electric utility, as defined in Section 224.3 of that code, a gas corporation, as defined in Section 222 of that code, a telephone corporation, as defined in Section 234 of that code, a water corporation, as defined in Section 241 of that code, or a public water district as defined in Section 20200 of the Water Code, is exempt from all hours-of-service regulations while operating a public utility or public water district vehicle.(B) A driver hired directly as a contractor by an electrical corporation, a local publicly owned electric utility, a gas corporation, a telephone corporation, a water corporation, or a public water district, as those entities are defined in subparagraph (A), or as a subcontractor hired directly by the original contractor, is exempt from all hours-of-service regulations while operating a vehicle for the purpose of restoring utility service during an emergency on behalf of the entity that hired the original contractor. The driver shall maintain a driver’s record of duty status and shall keep a duplicate copy in their possession when driving a vehicle subject to this chapter. These records shall be presented immediately upon request by any authorized employee of the department, or any police officer or deputy sheriff.(C) For purposes of subparagraph (B), “emergency” means a sudden, unexpected occurrence involving a clear and imminent danger, demanding immediate action to prevent or mitigate loss of, or damage to, life, health, property, or essential public services. “Unexpected occurrence” includes, but is not limited to, fires, floods, earthquakes or other soil or geologic movements, riots, accidents, inclement weather, natural disaster, sabotage, or other occurrence, whether natural or man-made, that interrupts the delivery of essential services, such as electricity, medical care, sewer, water, telecommunications, and telecommunication transmissions, or otherwise immediately threatens human life or public welfare.(4) Any other exceptions applicable to drivers assigned to governmental fire suppression and prevention, as determined by the department.(5) A driver employed by a law enforcement agency, as defined in Section 390.3(f)(2) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as that section now exists or is hereafter amended, during an emergency or to restore the public peace.(c) The regulations adopted under Section 34501 for vehicles engaged in the transportation of farm products in intrastate commerce shall include all of the following provisions:(1) A driver employed by an agricultural carrier, including a carrier holding a seasonal permit, or by a private carrier, when transporting farm products from the field to the first point of processing or packing, shall not drive for any period after having been on duty 16 hours or more following 8 consecutive hours off duty and shall not drive for any period after having been on duty for 112 hours in any consecutive eight-day period, except that a driver transporting special situation farm products from the field to the first point of processing or packing, or transporting livestock from pasture to pasture, may be permitted, during one period of not more than 28 consecutive days or a combination of two periods totaling not more than 28 days in a calendar year, to drive for not more than 12 hours during any workday of not more than 16 hours. A driver who thereby exceeds the driving time limits specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall maintain a driver’s record of duty status, and shall keep a duplicate copy in their possession when driving a vehicle subject to this chapter. These records shall be presented immediately upon request by any authorized employee of the department, or any police officer or deputy sheriff.(2) Upon the request of the Secretary of Food and Agriculture, the commissioner may, for good cause, temporarily waive the maximum on-duty time limits applicable to any eight-day period when an emergency exists due to inclement weather, natural disaster, or an adverse economic condition that threatens to disrupt the orderly movement of farm products during harvest for the duration of the emergency. For purposes of this paragraph, an emergency does not include a strike or labor dispute.(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the following terms have the following meanings:(A) “Farm products” means every agricultural, horticultural, viticultural, or vegetable product of the soil, honey and beeswax, oilseeds, poultry, livestock, milk, or timber.(B) “First point of processing or packing” means a location where farm products are dried, canned, extracted, fermented, distilled, frozen, ginned, eviscerated, pasteurized, packed, packaged, bottled, conditioned, or otherwise manufactured, processed, or preserved for distribution in wholesale or retail markets.(C) “Special situation farm products” means fruit, tomatoes, sugar beets, grains, wine grapes, grape concentrate, cotton, or nuts.SEC. 7. Section 34501.5 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:34501.5. (a) The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations that, in the judgment of the department, are designed to promote the safe operation of vehicles described in Sections 39830 and 82321 of the Education Code and Sections 545 and 34500 of this code. The Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol shall appoint a committee of 11 members to act in an advisory capacity when developing and adopting regulations affecting school pupil transportation buses and school pupil transportation operations. The advisory committee shall consist of 11 members appointed as follows:(1) One member of the State Department of Education.(2) One member of the Department of Motor Vehicles.(3) One member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol.(4) One member who is employed as a schoolbus driver.(5) One member of the California Office of Traffic Safety in the Transportation Agency.(6) Two members who are schoolbus contractors, one of whom shall be from an urban area of the state and one of whom shall be from a rural area of the state, as determined by the department.(7) Two members who are representatives of school districts, one of whom shall be from an urban area of the state and one of whom shall be from a rural area of the state, as determined by the department.(8) One professionally licensed member of the American Academy of Pediatrics.(9) One member representing school pupil transportation operations other than schoolbus operations.(b) The department shall cooperate and confer with the advisory committee appointed pursuant to this section prior to adopting rules or regulations affecting school pupil transportation buses and school pupil transportation operations.SEC. 8. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.